California statutes. Public Resources Code
Except as otherwise provided in Sections 4294 to 4296, inclusive, any person that owns, controls, operates, or maintains any electrical transmission or distribution line upon any mountainous land, or in forest-covered land, brush-covered land, or grass-covered land shall, during such times and in such areas as are determined to be necessary by the director or the agency which has primary responsibility for the fire protection of such areas, maintain a clearance of the respective distances which are specified in this section in all directions between all vegetation and all conductors which are carrying electric current:

(a) For any line which is operating at 2,400 or more volts, but less than 72,000 volts, four feet.

(b) For any line which is operating at 72,000 or more volts, but less than 110,000 volts, six feet.

(c) For any line which is operating at 110,000 or more volts, 10 feet.

In every case, such distance shall be sufficiently great to furnish the required clearance at any position of the wire, or conductor when the adjacent air temperature is 120 degrees Fahrenheit, or less. Dead trees, old decadent or rotten trees, trees weakened by decay or disease and trees or portions thereof that are leaning toward the line which may contact the line from the side or may fall on the line shall be felled, cut, or trimmed so as to remove such hazard. The director or the agency which has primary responsibility for the fire protection of such areas may permit exceptions from the requirements of this section which are based upon the specific circumstances involved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4294.

A clearing to obtain line clearance is not required if self-supporting aerial cable is used. Forked trees, leaning trees, and any other growth which may fall across the line and break it shall, however, be removed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4295.

A person is not required by Section 4292 or 4293 to maintain any clearing on any land if such person does not have the legal right to maintain such clearing, nor do such sections require any person to enter upon or to damage property which is owned by any other person without the consent of the owner of the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4295.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, including Section 4295, a person who owns, controls, operates, or maintains an electrical transmission or distribution line may traverse land as necessary, regardless of land ownership or express permission to traverse land from the landowner, after providing notice and an opportunity to be heard to the landowner, to prune trees to maintain clearances pursuant to Section 4293, and to abate, by pruning or
 removal, any hazardous, dead, rotten, diseased, or structurally defective live trees. The clearances obtained when the pruning is performed shall be at the full discretion of the person that owns, controls, operates, or maintains any electrical transmission or distribution line, but shall be no less than what is required in Section 4293. This section shall apply to both high fire threat districts, as determined by the California Public Utilities Commission pursuant to its rulemaking authority, and to state responsibility areas.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not exempt a person who owns, controls, operates, or maintains an electrical transmission or distribution line from liability for damages for the removal of vegetation that is not covered by an easement granted to the person for the electrical transmission or
 distribution line.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 69.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4296.

Sections 4292 and 4293 do not apply if the transmission or distribution line voltage is 750 volts or less.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4296.5.

(a) Any person or corporation operating a railroad on forest, brush, or grass-covered land shall, if ordered by the director or the agency having primary responsibility for fire protection of the area, destroy, remove, or modify so as not to be flammable any vegetation or other flammable material defined by regulation of the director to be a fire hazard on the railroad right-of-way. The director shall adopt regulations establishing fire prevention hazard reduction standards for broad geographic areas by fuel type, slope, and potential for ignition from hot or flaming exhaust, carbon particles, hot metal, burning signal devices, burning tobacco, and other similar potential sources of ignition.

(b) The order to destroy, remove, or modify vegetation or other flammable material shall specify the location of the hazard to be destroyed, removed, or modified within the right-of-way, the width of the hazard which shall not exceed the width of the right-of-way, and the time within which compliance with the order is required.

(c) The director or the agency having primary responsibility for fire protection of the area shall allow a reasonable period of time for compliance with an order to destroy, remove, or modify vegetation or other flammable material.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 698.)
-------------------------------------------

4297.

Upon the showing of the director that the unrestricted use of any grass-covered land, grain-covered land, brush-covered land, or forest-covered land is, in the judgment of the director, a menace to life or property due to conditions tending to cause or allow the rapid spread of fires that may occur on the lands or because of the inaccessible character of the lands, the Governor through the director, may, by a proclamation, which declares that condition and designates the area to which, and the period during which the proclamation shall apply, require that the area be closed to hunting and fishing and to entry by a person except a person that is within one of the following classes:

(a) Owners and lessees of land in the area.

(b) Bona fide residents in the area.

(c) Persons engaged in some bona fide business, trade, occupation, or calling in the area and persons employed by them in connection with that business, trade, occupation, or calling.

(d) Authorized agents or employees of a public utility entering the area for the purpose of operating or maintaining public utility works or equipment within the area.

(e) Members of an organized firefighting force.

(f) A federal, state or local officer in the performance of their duties.

(g) Persons traveling on public roads or highways through the area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 70.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4298.

The proclamation by the Governor shall be released to the wire news services in the state, and shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in each county which contains any lands covered by the proclamation. Notice of closure shall also be posted on trails or roads entering the area covered by the proclamation. The closure shall be effective upon issuance of the proclamation by the Governor. Each notice shall clearly set forth the area to be subject to closure and the effective date of such closure. The closure shall remain in full force and effect until the Governor shall by order terminate it. The notice of such termination shall follow the same procedure by which such closure was effected. The order of termination shall be effected upon issuance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4299.

A person who violates Section 4297 or 4298 is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 10 days nor more than 90 days or both the fine and imprisonment. All state and county law enforcement officers shall enforce orders of closure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 90, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Restricted Areas [4331. - 4333.]

4331.

Except at the places or during the period of time designated by regulations adopted pursuant to the authority of the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States, a person shall not smoke or build a campfire upon national forest land unless the person has a written permit to do so issued by an authorized agent of the Secretary of Agriculture and possesses the firefighting tools that are required by the permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 71.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4332.

Whenever it is necessary in the interests of public peace or safety, the director, with the consent of the Governor, may order closed to camping, hunting, trapping, or the use of firearms, any area in any state park or state forest. The director shall post and enforce such closure order in such area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4333.

Any order which is issued pursuant to Section 4332 shall be published twice in at least one newspaper of general circulation in any county that is affected by the order. The publication shall be separated by a period of not less than one week and not more than two weeks. The order shall also be posted in such public places in each county as the director may direct, and along roads and trails which pass through such areas declared to be closed to camping or entry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Rubbish Dumps [4371. - 4376.]

4371.

The definitions in this section govern the construction of this chapter.

(a) “Fire protection agency” means the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection on all lands designated as state responsibility areas pursuant to Section 4125, and it means the applicable fire protection district, service district, county fire department, or federal agency on all other lands.

(b) “Solid waste” means solid waste as defined in Section 40191.

(c) “Solid waste facility” means a solid waste facility as defined in Section 40194.

(d) “Flammable material” does not include any structure or building maintained as an integral part of any solid waste facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 427, Sec. 137.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4372.

A person shall maintain any solid waste facility outside of the exterior boundaries of any city in strict accordance with the terms and conditions prescribed by Sections 4373 and 4374.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1333, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

4373.

Any solid waste facility, for which a permit is required pursuant to Section 66796.30 of the Government Code, shall be maintained with a clearance of flammable material for a minimum distance of 45.7 meters (150 feet) from the periphery of any exposed flammable solid waste.

(a) Any structure, building, or part of any structure or building located within 45.7 meters (150 feet) of the periphery of any exposed flammable solid waste shall also be maintained with a clearance of flammable material for a minimum of 45.7 meters (150 feet) from the periphery of the structure or building.

(b) Sound and living trees may be left standing within the areas required to be cleared of flammable material, provided the following requirements are met: 

(1) Wildfire cannot travel into the canopy of any tree left standing.

(2) Any tree left standing does not pose a fire safety threat or prevent fire equipment access to and near the exposed flammable solid waste.

(3) All dead limbs, and all limbs within 3 meters (10 feet) of the ground are removed from any tree left standing.

(c) Selected and isolated shrubs may remain within the areas required to be cleared of flammable material if all dead material is removed and each shrub is trimmed up so that fire cannot travel through the shrub canopy or pose a fire safety threat.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1333, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

4374.

Any solid waste facility, for which a permit is not required pursuant to Section 66796.31 of the Government Code, shall be maintained with a clearance of flammable material for a minimum distance of 9.45 meters (30 feet) from the periphery of any exposed flammable solid waste.

(a) Any structure, building, or part of a structure or building which is located within 9.45 meters (30 feet) of the periphery of any exposed flammable solid waste shall also be maintained with a clearance of flammable material for a minimum distance of 9.45 meters (30 feet) from the periphery of the structure or building.

(b) The fire protection agency may, in writing, require additional minimum flammable clearance provisions not to exceed any of the minimum clearance provisions of Section 4373. A reasonable time for compliance with the additional clearance provisions shall be specified in the written notice.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1333, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

4376.

A person who maintains a solid waste facility in violation of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punished for a first conviction by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), and, for a second or subsequent conviction within five years of a prior conviction of a violation of this chapter, by a fine not less than five hundred dollars ($500) or more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) or imprisonment in the county jail for a period not to exceed 30 days, or both that fine and imprisonment. Each and every day of violation is a separate and distinct offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 90, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Prohibited Activities [4411. - 4446.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions and General Provisions [4411. - 4418.]

4411.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4412.

“Incinerator” means any device constructed of nonflammable materials for the purpose of burning therein trash, debris, and other flammable materials, excluding those devices regulated by Section 4438 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4412.5.

“Campfire” has the same meaning as defined in Section 4103.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 270, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4413.

“Zone A” includes Mono, Inyo, San Bernardino, Santa Barbara, Ventura, Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, San Diego, and Imperial Counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 633, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4414.

“Zone B” includes any county and portion of any county which is not included in Zone A.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4414.5.

“Residue” means flammable wood fiber byproducts or waste, including, but not limited to, sawdust, bark, chips, slabs, trimmings, and hogged particles from a sawmill or plant engaged in processing or converting forest products into lumber, shook, ties, poles, posts, veneer, shakes, shingles, and planed or milled products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1333, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

4415.

This chapter does not apply to the setting of fire on lands within any municipal corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4416.

This chapter does not authorize a county firewarden, a firefighter, or a county officer to obligate the state for the payment of any money.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 72.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4417.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) or (c), a reward of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall be paid out of any state funds which are made available to the department for fire protection to any person, other than a regularly paid firefighter, peace officer, or agent or employee of the department, whose information leads to the arrest and conviction, or commitment to a public facility, of any person who willfully and maliciously sets fire to, or who attempts to willfully and maliciously set fire to, any property which is included within any state responsibility area as established under Article 3 (commencing with Section 4125) of Chapter 1.

(b) If the fire, or attempt to set a fire, results in death or great bodily injury to anyone, including fire protection personnel, a reward of up to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) shall be paid.

(c) If the fire causes substantial structural damage, an enhanced reward of up to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) shall be paid.

(d) The reward may be paid on the initiative of the department or upon application by any person qualifying therefor. One reward of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall be paid under subdivision (a), or twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) under subdivision (b), or twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) under subdivision (c), as the case may be, with respect to the same event or series of events involving the same defendant or defendants. If the department determines that more than one person is eligible for a reward arising out of information relating to the same event or series of events, the reward shall be divided among those persons, as determined by the department, taking into consideration the significance of the information contributed by each of those persons. The department may establish a program to preserve the anonymity of any person providing information and may pay a reward under that program.

(e) Rewards paid under this section shall be considered an emergency fire suppression and detection expenditure for budgeting purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 15, Sec. 1.   Effective May 21, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4417.5.

(a) For the purpose of obtaining information leading to the arrest and conviction of persons who willfully and maliciously set fire to, or who attempt to willfully and maliciously set fire to, any property which is included within a state responsibility area, as defined in Section 4102, including a hazardous fire area designated by the board pursuant to Section 4252 or by the director pursuant to Section 4253, the department shall, during the fire season, make a toll-free 800 telephone number available for, and establish, a program to protect the anonymity of persons providing that information and to facilitate the identification of persons who are eligible for the payment of rewards authorized pursuant to Section 1547 of the Penal Code and Section 4417.

(b) The department may cooperate, and enter into interagency agreements, with other state agencies in carrying out this section, including, but not limited to, the Cal-TIP program of the Department of Fish and Game.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   Effective July 21, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4418.

Peace officers designated by the director may expend funds the director deems necessary to purchase evidence and to employ operators to obtain evidence in cases of arson to any property within a state responsibility area as established under Article 3 (commencing with Section 4125) of Chapter 1.

Funds expended pursuant to this section shall be repaid to the peace officer making the expenditure upon claims approved by the director and subject to post audit by the Department of Finance. Claims, when approved, shall be paid out of funds appropriated for the support or use of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1090, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Prohibited Activities [4421. - 4446.]

4421.

A person shall not set fire or cause fire to be set to a forest, brush, or other flammable material that is on land that is not the person’s own land, or under the person’s legal control, without the permission of the owner, lessee, or owner’s agent or lessee of the land.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 73.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4422.

A person shall not do either of the following:

(a) Willfully or knowingly allow fire to burn uncontrolled on land that the person owns or controls, or to escape to the lands of any person other than that of the owner.

(b) Allow any fire kindled or attended by the person to escape from the person’s control or to spread to the land of any person other than from the land from which the fire originated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 74.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4423.

A person shall not burn any brush, stumps, logs, fallen timber, fallows, slash, grass-covered land, brush-covered land, forest-covered land, or other flammable material, in any state responsibility area, area receiving fire protection by the department by contract, or upon federal lands administered by the United States Department of Agriculture or Department of the Interior, unless the person has a written permit from the department or its duly authorized representative or the authorized federal officer on federal lands administered by the United States Department of Agriculture or of the Interior and in strict accordance with the terms of the permit:

(a) At any time in Zone A.

(b) At any time in Zone B between May 1st and the date the director declares, by proclamation, that the hazardous fire conditions have abated for that year, or at any other time in Zone B during any year when the director has declared, by proclamation, that unusual fire hazard conditions exist in the area.

The issuing agency may require the permittee to contact the agency to determine permit suspension status prior to burning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 270, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

4423.1.

(a) Burning under permit by a person on public or private lands, except within incorporated cities, may be suspended, restricted, or otherwise prohibited by proclamation. Any of the following public officers may issue a proclamation, which shall be applicable within their respective jurisdictions:

(1) The director or the director’s designee.

(2) Any county fire warden with the approval of the director.

(3) The federal officers directing activities within California of the United States Bureau of Land Management, the National Park Service, and the United States Forest
 Service.

(b) The proclamation may be issued when, in the judgment of the issuing public official, the menace of destruction by fire to life, improved property, or natural resources is, or is forecast to become, extreme due to critical fire weather, fire suppression forces being heavily committed to control fires already burning, acute dryness of the vegetation, or other factors that may cause the rapid spread of fire. A proclamation is effective on issuance or at a time specified therein and shall remain in effect until a proclamation removing the suspension, restriction, or prohibition is issued. The proclamation may be effective for a single day or longer. The proclamation shall declare the conditions that necessitate its issuance, designate the geographic area to which it applies, require that all or specified burning under permit
 be suspended, restricted, or prohibited until the conditions necessitating the proclamation abate, and identify the public official issuing the proclamation. The proclamation may be in the form of a verbal or audio recorded telephone message, a press release, or a posted order.

(c) The proclamation may be issued without complying with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 75.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4423.2.

(a) Whenever the burning under permit has been suspended , restricted, or prohibited by proclamation pursuant to Section 4423.1, the officer having jurisdiction may issue a restricted temporary burning permit in instances in which the continuation of burning may be essential for reasons of public health, safety, or welfare. The permit may stipulate any special precautions that are required to be followed to reduce the risk of uncontrolled fire originating from the operation.

(b) Violation of the terms of a restricted temporary burning permit is a misdemeanor, and any person upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250). No part of the fine shall be suspended. The court may permit the fine prescribed by this section to be paid in installments if the court determines that the defendant is unable to pay the fine in one lump sum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 270, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

4423.3.

The use of a campfire is not restricted or prohibited by a proclamation issued pursuant to Section 4423.1, unless specifically restricted or prohibited in that or a subsequent proclamation. If restricted by proclamation, campfires shall be confined to facilities constructed for that purpose within the confines of a campground established, maintained, and open for public use, whether publicly or privately owned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 270, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

4423.4.

Outdoor smoking is not restricted or prohibited by a proclamation issued pursuant to Section 4423.1, unless specifically restricted or prohibited in that or a subsequent proclamation. If restricted by proclamation, smoking shall be confined to the following:

(a) Within motor vehicles while operating or parked on established roads, rest stops, or parking areas cleared of flammable vegetation.

(b) Within established campgrounds open to the public.

(c) Within an area that is at least three feet or approximately one meter in diameter which has been cleared to mineral soil by removal of all flammable vegetation and duff.

The exempted locations may be included within the smoking ban if specifically noticed in the proclamation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 270, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

4423.5.

Use of open fire or burning under permit within an area closed by proclamation pursuant to the provisions of Section 4423.1, except as provided in Sections 4423.2, 4423.3, and 4423.4, is a misdemeanor and any person upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100). No part of such fine shall be suspended. The court may permit the fine prescribed by this section to be paid in installments if the court determines that the defendant is unable to pay the fine in one lump sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1074.)
-------------------------------------------

4425.

Any violation of the terms of a burning permit issued pursuant to Section 4423, a restricted temporary burning permit issued pursuant to Section 4423.2, or a campfire permit issued pursuant to Section 4433 renders the permit null and void.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1074.)
-------------------------------------------

4426.

A person shall not set a backfire, or cause a backfire to be set, except under the direct supervision or permission of a state or federal forest officer, unless it can be established that the setting of such backfire was necessary for the purpose of saving life or valuable property.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4427.

During any time of the year when burning permits are required in an area pursuant to this article, no person shall use or operate any motor, engine, boiler, stationary equipment, welding equipment, cutting torches, tarpots, or grinding devices from which a spark, fire, or flame may originate, which is located on or near any forest-covered land, brush-covered land, or grass-covered land, without doing both of the following:

(a) First clearing away all flammable material, including snags, from the area around such operation for a distance of 10 feet.

(b) Maintain one serviceable round point shovel with an overall length of not less than forty-six (46) inches and one backpack pump water-type fire extinguisher fully equipped and ready for use at the immediate area during the operation. 

This section does not apply to portable powersaws and other portable tools powered by a gasoline-fueled internal combustion engine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 900.)
-------------------------------------------

4428.

No person, except any member of an emergency crew or except the driver or owner of any service vehicle owned or operated by or for, or operated under contract with, a publicly or privately owned utility, which is used in the construction, operation, removal, or repair of the property or facilities of such utility when engaged in emergency operations, shall use or operate any vehicle, machine, tool or equipment powered by an internal combustion engine operated on hydrocarbon fuels, in any industrial operation located on or near any forest, brush, or grass-covered land between April 1 and December 1 of any year, or at any other time when ground litter and vegetation will sustain combustion permitting the spread of fire, without providing and maintaining, for firefighting purposes only, suitable and serviceable tools in the amounts, manner and location prescribed in this section.

(a) On any such operation a sealed box of tools shall be located, within the operating area, at a point accessible in the event of fire. This fire toolbox shall contain: one backpack pump-type fire extinguisher filled with water, two axes, two McLeod fire tools, and a sufficient number of shovels so that each employee at the operation can be equipped to fight fire.

(b) One or more serviceable chainsaws of three and one-half or more horsepower with a cutting bar 20 inches in length or longer shall be immediately available within the operating area, or, in the alternative, a full set of timber-felling tools shall be located in the fire toolbox, including one crosscut falling saw six feet in length, one double-bit ax with a 36-inch handle, one sledge hammer or maul with a head weight of six, or more, pounds and handle length of 32 inches, or more, and not less than two falling wedges.

(c) Each rail speeder and passenger vehicle, used on such operation shall be equipped with one shovel and one ax, and any other vehicle used on the operation shall be equipped with one shovel. Each tractor used in such operation shall be equipped with one shovel.

(d) As used in this section:

(1) “Vehicle” means a device by which any person or property may be propelled, moved, or drawn over any land surface, excepting a device moved by human power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.

(2) “Passenger vehicle” means a vehicle which is self-propelled and which is designed for carrying not more than 10 persons including the driver, and which is used or maintained for the transportation of persons, but does not include any motortruck or truck tractor.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 445.)
-------------------------------------------

4429.

During any time of the year when burning permits are required in an area pursuant to this article, at any camp maintained in such area for the residence of employees, or at any local headquarters in such area of any industrial, agricultural, or other operations on or near any forest-covered land or brush-covered land, there shall be provided and maintained at all times, in a specific location, for firefighting purposes only, a sufficient supply of serviceable tools to equip 50 percent of the able-bodied, personnel, resident of such camp, or working out of such headquarters, for fighting fires. Among these tools shall be included shovels, axes, saws, backpack pumps, and scraping tools. With such tools there shall also be one serviceable headlight adaptable for attachment to at least one-half of the tractor-bulldozers used on the operation, and a sufficient number of canteens and flashlights to equip a third of the able-bodied personnel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1171.)
-------------------------------------------

4430.

During any time of the year when burning permits are required in an area pursuant to this article, a person, copartnership, firm, corporation or company, shall not use or operate in such area any steam-operated engine, machine equipment, mill or industrial plant, located on or near forest-covered land or brush-covered land, without providing one adequate force pump or water under pressure equivalent to a pump, and not less than 200 feet of hose not less than one inch in diameter for each steam-operated engine or equipment. The pump or water pressure required in this section shall be capable of applying a minimum of 40 pounds pressure at the nozzle on 200 feet of hose, such nozzle to be one-fourth inch or larger in diameter. If two steam-operated engines or steam equipment are customarily operated within 100 feet of each other, only one engine or piece of equipment need be equipped with pump and hose.

This section does not apply to any internal combustion engine or to any steam or other locomotive which is being used in the business of a common carrier by railroad.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4431.

During any time of the year when burning permits are required in an area pursuant to this article, no person shall use or operate or cause to be operated in the area any portable saw, auger, drill, tamper, or other portable tool powered by a gasoline-fueled internal combustion engine on or near any forest-covered land, brush-covered land, or grass-covered land, within 25 feet of any flammable material, without providing and maintaining at the immediate locations of use or operation of the saw or tool, for firefighting purposes one serviceable round point shovel, with an overall length of not less than 46 inches, or one serviceable fire extinguisher. The Director of Forestry and Fire Protection shall by administrative regulation specify the type and size of fire extinguisher necessary to provide at least minimum assurance of controlling fire caused by use of portable power tools under various climatic and fuel conditions.

The required fire tools shall at no time be farther from the point of operation of the power saw or tool than 25 feet with unrestricted access for the operator from the point of operation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 427, Sec. 138.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4432.

(a) A person shall not leave a campfire, kindled or attended by that person, burning or unextinguished unless one of the following requirements is satisfied:

(1) The person leaves some other person in attendance.

(2) The fire is enclosed within a stove, oven, drum, or other nonflammable container, in such manner that the fire cannot escape from the container.

(b) A person shall not allow a campfire, kindled or attended by that person, to spread after it is built.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 76.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4433.

(a) A person shall not light, maintain, or use a campfire upon brush-covered land, grass-covered land, or forest-covered land that is the property of another person unless the person first obtains a written permit from the owner, lessee, or agent of the owner or lessee of the property.

(b) If, however, campsites and special areas have been established by the property owner and posted as areas for camping, a permit is not necessary.

(c) A written campfire permit duly issued by or under the authority of the United States Forest Service is necessary for use on land under the jurisdiction
 and control of the United States Forest Service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 77.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4434.

The escape of any campfire from the control of any person who is maintaining the campfire is prima facie evidence that such person was negligent in maintaining the campfire.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4435.

If any fire originates from the operation or use of any engine, machine, barbecue, incinerator, railroad rolling stock, chimney, or any other device which may kindle a fire, the occurrence of the fire is prima facie evidence of negligence in the maintenance, operation, or use of such engine, machine, barbecue, incinerator, railroad rolling stock, chimney, or other device. If such fire escapes from the place where it originated and it can be determined which person’s negligence caused such fire, such person is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4436.

A person shall not refuse or fail to render assistance in combating a forest, brush, or grass fire at the summons of the department, or its authorized agent who is charged with the prevention or suppression of fire or the enforcement of the state fire laws, or any county firewarden, firefighter, or county officer who is charged with the duty of preventing or combating forest, brush, or grass fires, or any officer of a county fire protection district, unless prevented from so doing by sickness or physical disability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 78.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4437.

(a) Outside the exterior boundaries of cities, every processor of forest products shall exercise due diligence in the disposal of flammable material incident to the processing, so that the material does not cause the inception or spread of uncontrolled fire.

(b) Every person, copartnership, firm, corporation, or company that operates a sawmill or plant engaged in the processing or converting of forest products into lumber, shook, ties, poles, posts, veneer, shakes, shingles, and planed or milled products, shall dispose of flammable material incident to that operation. If such flammable material is not to be used as fuel, or as a byproduct, within the operation, it shall be disposed of by burning or by other alternative methods which effectively prevent the flammable material from constituting a fire hazard. The disposal or storage of flammable waste material or residue shall be made in any of the ways which are prescribed in Section 4438, 4439, or 4440.
